Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202545-342
Engage in business without license; penalty.

Any person who, by any device, subterfuge, or pretense whatsoever, engages in or continues any of the kinds of business or enterprise permitted to licensees by the Nebraska Installment Loan and Sales Act without having obtained the license required by the act, with intent to evade the provisions of the act, is guilty of a Class I misdemeanor.

Laws 1965, c. 268, § 9, p. 762;

Laws 1979, LB 478, § 3;

Laws 1980, LB 279, § 8;

Laws 1981, LB 214, § 6;

Laws 1992, LB 269, § 3;

Laws 2004, LB 999, § 34;

Laws 2025, LB474, § 63.